Illinois, session 104th, SB3186.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by changing Section 2N as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2N)  (from Ch. 121 1/2, par. 262N)7    Sec. 2N. Non-English language transaction. 8    (a) If (i) a person conducts, in a language other than 9English, a retail transaction or negotiations related to a 10retail transaction resulting in a written contract and (ii) 11the consumer selects used an interpreter other than the 12retailer or an employee of the retailer in conducting the 13transaction or negotiations or selects the retailer or an 14employee of the retailer as the consumer's interpreter in 15conducting the transaction or negotiations, the retailer must 16have the consumer and the interpreter sign the following form 17forms: 18        I, (name of consumer), select used (name of 19    interpreter) to act as my interpreter during this retail 20    transaction or these negotiations. I understand I may 21    voluntarily choose to use the retailer or employee of the 22    retailer as my interpreter for conducting the transaction 23    or negotiations or may select a third-party interpreter.   SB3186- 2 -LRB104 17895 SPS 31331 b1    The obligations of the contract or other written agreement 2    will be were explained to me in my native language by the 3    interpreter to facilitate understanding of . I understand 4    the contract or other written agreement. 5        (signature of consumer) 6        (relationship of interpreter to consumer) 7        I, (name of interpreter), acted as interpreter during 8    this retail transaction or these negotiations. The 9    obligations of the contract or other written agreement 10    were explained to (name of consumer) in the consumer's 11    native language. I understand the contract or other 12    written agreement. 13        (signature of interpreter) 14        (relationship of interpreter to consumer)15    (b) (Blank). If (i) a person conducts, in a language other 16than English, a retail transaction or negotiations related to 17a retail transaction resulting in a written contract and (ii) 18the retailer or an employee of the retailer acted as the 19consumer's interpreter in conducting the transaction or 20negotiations, the retailer must have the consumer sign the 21following form in the consumer's native language (except as 22provided in subsection (c)): 23        This retail transaction or these negotiations were 24    conducted in (language), which is my native language. I 25    voluntarily choose to have the retailer act as my 26    interpreter during the negotiations. The obligations of   SB3186- 3 -LRB104 17895 SPS 31331 b1    the contract or other written agreement were explained to 2    me in my native language. I understand the contract or 3    other written agreement. 4        (signature of consumer)       (signature of retailer)5    (c) If a language that cannot be written is used in the 6retail transaction or in negotiations related to a retail 7transaction, then the form set forth in subsection (a) (b) 8shall be in the English language.9    (d) If a person used forms substantially similar to the 10forms prescribed in subsection (a) subsections (a) and (b) in 11the regular course of business before January 1, 2002, the 12person may continue to use those forms instead of the forms 13prescribed in subsection (a) subsections (a) and (b).14    (e) The terms of this Section do not apply to transactions 15made pursuant to a credit card issued to the buyer, whether 16such card is issued by the seller or by a third party.17(Source: P.A. 92-478, eff. 8-23-01.)